Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1625.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 28-1592, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE28-1592. Commencement of action; original citation changes A. A civil traffic violation case is commenced by issuance or filing of a uniform traffic ticket and complaint as provided in this article. B. A civil traffic violation case shall be commenced as follows: 1. If a case is commenced by issuance, it shall be issued within sixty days after the alleged violation. 2. If the case is commenced by filing, it shall be filed within sixty days after the alleged violation and shall be served within ninety days after the filing date. 3. Except as provided in paragraph 4 of this subsection, within one hundred eighty days after the alleged violation if the alleged violation is under investigation in conjunction with a traffic accident. 4. Within one year after the alleged violation if the alleged violation is under investigation in conjunction with a traffic accident resulting in death. C. On an original citation, if a peace officer or duly authorized traffic agent changes the date, time or location of the violation or the section of law that is allegedly violated, the original citation must be amended through the court pursuant to the Arizona rules of civil procedure for traffic and civil boating violations. D. A moving civil traffic violation may only be issued by a peace officer. END_STATUTE